District of Columbia statutes.
34-910

Notice as to hearings; compulsory attendance of witnesses.

The Commission shall give the public utility and the complainant, if any, 10 days notice of the time and place when and where such hearing and investigation will be held and such matters considered and determined. Both the public utility and complainant shall be entitled to be heard and shall have process to enforce the attendance of witnesses.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 983, ch. 150, § 8, par. 40
Commission rate schedules, amendments, see § 34-602.
This section is referenced in § 34-602, § 34-911, and § 34-916.
1981 Ed., § 43-610.
1973 Ed., § 43-410.